Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1227
Violations; penalty.

(1) Any person who violates any provision of sections 48-1219 to 48-1227, or who discharges or in any other manner discriminates against any employee because such employee has made any complaint to his employer, the commission, or any other person, or has instituted, or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or related to sections 48-1219 to 48-1227, or has testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) Any employer who violates the provisions of sections 48-1219 to 48-1227 by failing to keep the records required hereunder, or to furnish such records to the commission upon request, or who falsifies such records, or who hinders, delays, or otherwise interferes with the commission in the performance of its duties in the enforcement of the provisions of sections 48-1219 to 48-1227, or refuses official entry into any place of employment which it is authorized by the provisions of sections 48-1219 to 48-1227 to inspect, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 389, § 9, p. 1369;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 304.